Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB544.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Health Care Practitioner Credentialing Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"CAQH." The Council for Affordable Quality Healthcare."CAQH credentialing application." The application used to collect the credentials data commonly requested by health insurers for purposes of credentialing."Credentialing." The process of assessing and validating the qualifications of a health care practitioner, including an 12345678910111213141516171819 evaluation of licensure status, education, training, experience, competence and professional judgment."Federally qualified health center." A federally qualified health center as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(l)(2)(B) (relating to definitions) or a federally qualified health center look-alike that is a participating provider with the Department of Human Services under the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code."Health care practitioner." As defined under section 103 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act. The term shall include:(1) A health care practitioner at a federally qualified health center.(2) An individual who engages in the practice of dentistry as defined in section 2 of the act of May 1, 1933 (P.L.216, No.76), known as The Dental Law."Health insurer." As follows:(1) An entity that contracts or offers to contract to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for or reimburse any of the costs of health care services in exchange for a premium, including a Medicaid managed care organization as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 1396b(m)(1)(A) (relating to payment to states), and an entity licensed under any of the following:(i) The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921.(ii) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(iii) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations).20250HB0544PN0540 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).(2) The term does not include the following types of insurance or any combination thereof:(i) Accident only.(ii) Fixed indemnity.(iii) Credit.(iv) Vision.(v) Specified disease.(vi) Medicare supplement.(vii) Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services supplement policy.(viii) Long-term care or disability income.(ix) Workers' compensation.(x) Automobile medical payment insurance.(xi) Hospital indemnity.Section 3. Utilization of CAQH.All health insurers licensed to do business in this Commonwealth shall be required to accept the CAQH credentialing application or other form designated by the Insurance Department so long as the form is nationally recognized as an appropriate credentialing application when submitted by a health care practitioner for participation in the health insurer's provider panel. All health care practitioners shall use the CAQH or other designated form. An application shall be considered complete if the application is submitted through the CAQH electronic process or other process as designated by the Insurance Department and all required information is provided.Section 4. Credentialing.(a) Notice.--Within 10 business days after receiving a CAQH 20250HB0544PN0540 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 credentialing application, the health insurer shall notify the health care practitioner in writing on whether the application is complete or incomplete. The health insurer shall state the reasons why the application is incomplete within the time frame specified under this subsection.(b) Issuance.--The health insurer shall issue a credentialing determination within 45 business days after receiving a complete CAQH credentialing application. When a health care practitioner is not credentialed by a health insurer, the health insurer shall notify the health care practitioner in writing of the reasons for the decision within the time frame specified under this subsection.(c) Automatic credentialing.--Upon approving a health care practitioner's complete CAQH credentialing application with practices in multiple locations, the health care practitioner shall be automatically credentialed to serve in the health insurer's provider panel in all locations.Section 5. Penalty.The Insurance Department shall assess an administrative penalty on a health insurer for failure to utilize CAQH, or other designated application, or for intentionally and routinely failing to complete the credentialing process according to section 4. A health insurer may not be subject to an administrative penalty based on a health care practitioner's failure to use or complete an accurate CAQH credentialing application.Section 6. Rights.Nothing in this act shall be construed to guarantee the rights of a health care practitioner to participate in any health insurer network in this Commonwealth nor require a health 20250HB0544PN0540 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 insurer to accept any willing health care provider to an insurance network.Section 7. Rules and regulations.The Insurance Department shall promulgate rules and regulations to administer and enforce this act.Section 8. Repeals.All acts and parts of acts are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with this act.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB0544PN0540 - 5 - 12345678910